Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,102
Hospital authority; bonds, obligations; not debt of political subdivision.

The bonds and other obligations of the authority shall not be a debt of any county, city or village in which the authority is located or of the state, and neither the state nor any such county, city or village shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall they be payable out of any funds or properties other than those of the authority, and such bonds and obligations shall so state on their face. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation of the laws of this state.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.102.